Rhode Island statutes. Title 47 Weights and Measures
Chapter 7 Public Weighers

47-7-1.
Appointment of public weighers — Fees.

The town councils of the several towns and the city council of any city shall appoint one or more persons to be weighers of coal and other articles of merchandise, who shall be sworn and be removable at the pleasure of the town or city council appointing them, and shall receive such fees as may be fixed by the town or city council of the several towns or cities, which shall be paid by the seller; provided, that no person shall act as a public weigher of coal or other merchandise of which he or she is either the buyer or seller, or in the sale whereof he or she has any interest.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 21; P.L. 1899, ch. 611, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 164, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

47-7-1

.

47-7-2.
Sale of merchandise without certificate from weigher.

Every person who shall sell coal or other merchandise without its being first weighed by a weigher provided for in §

47-7-1

, when the weighing shall be demanded by the purchaser, and procuring a certificate of the weight for the purchaser, shall be fined twenty dollars ($20.00) for each offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 22; P.L. 1899, ch. 611, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 164, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

47-7-2

.